Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7273.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-91 of the General Laws entitled "Interstate Medical Licensure
Compact" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-91-26. Implementation.
This chapter shall be implemented and the state is hereby directed to complete all necessary
membership requirements no later than July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 104
TELEMEDICINE AND OUT-OF-STATE MEDICINE
23-104-1. Telemedicine and out-of-state medicine.
(a) All in-state residents shall have access to telemedicine in accordance with chapter 81
of title 27.
(b) Patients may receive telemedicine services, including services from out-of-state
providers pursuant to chapter 91 of title 5 ("interstate medical licensure compact").
(c) The department of health and the office of health insurance commissioner shall
implement rules and regulations, as necessary, to carry out the provisions of this section.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003608
========
LC003608 - Page 2 of 3